Massachusetts, session 194th, S1091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 328 of chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following:-
No food service entity or retail store who donates food, including open-dated food whose
date has passed, directly to an individual without charge or at a charge sufficient only to cover
the cost of handling such food, shall be liable for civil damages for any injury arising out of the
condition of such food; provided, however, that at the time of donation such food is not
misbranded and is not adulterated and has not been manufactured, process, prepared, handled or
stored in violation of applicable regulations of the department of public health; and provided,
further, that such injury is not the result of negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct of
the donor or any person employed by or under the control of the donor.
of 1